Nevada, session 83, SB467.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, [480.935, 480.940,] 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and sections 15 and 16 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41
of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter
391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law
to be confidential, all public books and public records of a
governmental entity must be open at all times during office hours to
inspection by any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or
memorandum may be prepared from those public books and public
records. Any such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to
supply the general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the
records or may be used in any other way to the advantage of the
governmental entity or of the general public. This section does not
supersede or in any manner affect the federal laws governing
copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in any other manner the
rights of a person in any written book or record which is
copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 2. NRS 239C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.120 1. The Nevada Commission on Homeland Security
is hereby created.
2. The Governor shall appoint to the Commission 16 voting
members that the Governor determines to be appropriate and who
serve at the Governor’s pleasure, which must include at least:
(a) The sheriff of each county whose population is 100,000 or
more.
(b) The chief of the county fire department in each county
whose population is 100,000 or more.
(c) A member of the medical community in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more.
(d) An employee of the largest incorporated city in each county
whose population is 700,000 or more.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(e) A representative recommended by the Inter-Tribal Council
of Nevada, Inc., or its successor organization, to represent tribal
governments in Nevada.
(f) The Director of the Department of Public Safety or his or her
designee.
3. The Governor shall appoint the President and CEO, or his or
her designee, of the Nevada Broadcasters Association, or its
successor organization, to serve as an ex officio voting member of
the Commission.
4. The Governor shall appoint:
(a) An officer of the United States Department of Homeland
Security whom the Department of Homeland Security has
designated for this State;
(b) The agent in charge of the office of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation in this State;
(c) The Chief of the Division; and
(d) The [Administrator] Deputy Director of the [Nevada] Office
of Information Security and Cyber Defense [Coordination]
appointed pursuant to NRS [480.920,] 242.101,
 as nonvoting members of the Commission.
5. The Senate Majority Leader shall appoint one member of the
Senate as a nonvoting member of the Commission.
6. The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint one member of
the Assembly as a nonvoting member of the Commission.
7. The term of office of each member of the Commission who
is a Legislator is 2 years.
8. The Governor or his or her designee shall:
(a) Serve as Chair of the Commission; and
(b) Appoint a member of the Commission to serve as Vice Chair
of the Commission.
Sec. 3. NRS 239C.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239C.160 The Commission shall, within the limits of available
money:
1. Make recommendations to the Governor, the Legislature,
agencies of this State, political subdivisions, tribal governments,
businesses located within this State and private persons who reside
in this State with respect to actions and measures that may be taken
to protect residents of this State and visitors to this State from
potential acts of terrorism and related emergencies.
2. Upon consideration of the most recent statewide strategic
plan prepared by the [Nevada] Office of Information Security and
Cyber Defense [Coordination] pursuant to [NRS 480.930,] section
13 of this act, make recommendations to the Governor, through the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Division, on the use of money received by the State from any
homeland security grant or related program, including, without
limitation, the State Homeland Security Grant Program and Urban
Area Security Initiative, in accordance with the following:
(a) The Division shall provide the Commission with program
guidance and briefings;
(b) The Commission must be provided briefings on existing and
proposed projects, and shall consider statewide readiness
capabilities and priorities for the use of money, administered by the
Division, from any homeland security grant or related program;
(c) The Commission shall serve as the public body which
reviews and makes recommendations for the State’s applications to
the Federal Government for homeland security grants or related
programs, as administered by the Division; and
(d) The Commission shall serve as the public body which
recommends, subject to approval by the Governor, the distribution
of money from any homeland security grant or related program for
use by state, local and tribal government agencies and private sector
organizations.
3. Propose goals and programs that may be set and carried out,
respectively, to counteract or prevent potential acts of terrorism and
related emergencies before such acts of terrorism and related
emergencies can harm or otherwise threaten residents of this State
and visitors to this State.
4. With respect to buildings, facilities, geographic features and
infrastructure that must be protected from acts of terrorism and
related emergencies to ensure the safety of the residents of this State
and visitors to this State, including, without limitation, airports other
than international airports, the Capitol Complex, dams, gaming
establishments, governmental buildings, highways, hotels,
information technology infrastructure, lakes, places of worship,
power lines, public buildings, public utilities, reservoirs, rivers and
their tributaries, and water facilities:
(a) Identify and categorize such buildings, facilities, geographic
features and infrastructure according to their susceptibility to and
need for protection from acts of terrorism and related emergencies;
and
(b) Study and assess the security of such buildings, facilities,
geographic features and infrastructure from acts of terrorism and
related emergencies.
5. Examine the use, deployment and coordination of response
agencies within this State to ensure that those agencies are
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
adequately prepared to protect residents of this State and visitors to
this State from acts of terrorism and related emergencies.
6. Assess, examine and review the use of information systems
and systems of communication used by response agencies within
this State to determine the degree to which such systems are
compatible and interoperable. After conducting the assessment,
examination and review, the Commission shall:
(a) Establish a state plan setting forth criteria and standards for
the compatibility and interoperability of those systems when used by
response agencies within this State; and
(b) Advise and make recommendations to the Governor relative
to the compatibility and interoperability of those systems when used
by response agencies within this State, with particular emphasis
upon the compatibility and interoperability of public safety radio
systems.
7. Assess, examine and review the operation and efficacy of
telephone systems and related systems used to provide emergency
911 service.
8. To the extent practicable, cooperate and coordinate with the
Division to avoid duplication of effort in developing policies and
programs for preventing and responding to acts of terrorism and
related emergencies.
9. Submit an annual briefing to the Governor assessing the
preparedness of the State to counteract, prevent and respond to
potential acts of terrorism and related emergencies, including, but
not limited to, an assessment of response plans and vulnerability
assessments of utilities, public entities and private business in this
State. The briefing must be based on information and documents
reasonably available to the Commission and must be compiled with
the advice of the Division after all utilities, public entities and
private businesses assessed have a reasonable opportunity to review
and comment on the Commission’s findings.
10. Perform any other acts related to their duties set forth in
subsections 1 to 9, inclusive, that the Commission determines are
necessary to protect or enhance:
(a) The safety and security of the State of Nevada;
(b) The safety of residents of the State of Nevada; and
(c) The safety of visitors to the State of Nevada.
Sec. 4. Chapter 242 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 5. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
1. The protection and security of information systems, and
the coordination of efforts to promote the protection and security
of information systems, are essential to protecting the health,
safety and welfare of the people of this State.
2. The continued development of technologies relating to
information systems and the expanding and diverse applications of
those technologies pose significant implications for the
functioning of any infrastructure in this State that is critical to the
health, safety and welfare of the people of this State, particularly
in the areas of transportation, health care, energy, education, law
enforcement and commercial enterprises.
3. Information systems and the application of information
systems relating to the operation of the State Government and
local governments make up a statewide cyberinfrastructure that is
integral to the delivery of essential services to the people of this
State and the essential functions of government that ensure the
protection of the health, safety and welfare of the people of this
State.
4. Protecting and securing the statewide cyberinfrastructure
requires the identification of the areas in which information
systems may be vulnerable to attack, unauthorized use or misuse
or other dangerous, harmful or destructive acts.
5. Protecting and securing the statewide cyberinfrastructure
requires an ability to identify and eliminate threats to information
systems in both the public and private sectors.
6. Protecting and securing the statewide cyberinfrastructure
requires a strategic statewide plan for responding to incidents in
which information systems are compromised, breached or
damaged, including, without limitation, actions taken to:
(a) Minimize the harmful impacts of such incidents on the
health, safety and welfare of the people of this State;
(b) Minimize the disruptive effects of such incidents on the
delivery of essential services to the people of this State and on the
essential functions of government that ensure the protection of
the health, safety and welfare of the people of this State; and
(c) Ensure the uninterrupted and continuous delivery of
essential services to the people of this State and the uninterrupted
and continuous operations of the essential functions of
government that ensure the protection of the health, safety and
welfare of the people of this State.
7. Protecting and securing the statewide cyberinfrastructure
depends on collaboration and cooperation, including the sharing
of information and analysis regarding cybersecurity threats,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
among local, state and federal agencies and across a broad
spectrum of the public and private sectors.
8. Institutions of higher education play a critical role in
protecting and securing statewide cyberinfrastructure by
developing programs that support a skilled workforce, promote
innovation and contribute to a more secure statewide
cyberinfrastructure.
9. It is therefore in the public interest that the Legislature
enact provisions to enable the State to prepare for and mitigate
risks to, and otherwise protect, information systems and statewide
cyberinfrastructure.
Sec. 6. As used in sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 7, 8 and 9 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 7. “Deputy Director” means the Deputy Director of the
Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense appointed by
the Chief pursuant to NRS 242.101.
Sec. 8. “Security of an information system” includes, without
limitation, the security of:
1. The physical infrastructure of an information system; and
2. Information, including, without limitation, personal
information, that is stored on, transmitted to, from or through or
generated by an information system.
Sec. 9. “State agency” means every public agency, bureau,
board, commission, department or division of the Executive
Branch of the State Government.
Sec. 10. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall:
1. Develop procedures for risk-based assessments that
identify vulnerabilities in the information systems that are
operated or maintained by state agencies and any potential threats
that may exploit such vulnerabilities;
2. Based on the results of risk-based assessments, identify
risks to the security of information systems that are operated or
maintained by state agencies; and
3. Develop best practices for preparing for and mitigating
risks to, and otherwise protecting, the security of information
systems that are operated or maintained by state agencies.
Sec. 11. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall:
1. Establish partnerships with:
(a) Local governments;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; and
(c) Private entities, to the extent practicable,
 to encourage the development of strategies to prepare for and
mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of information
systems that are operated or maintained by a public or private
entity in this State.
2. Establish partnerships to assist and receive assistance from
local governments and appropriate agencies of the Federal
Government regarding the development of strategies to prepare for
and mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the security of
information systems.
3. Consult with the Division of Emergency Management of
the Office of the Military regarding the development of strategies
to prepare for and mitigate risks to, and otherwise protect, the
security of information systems.
4. Coordinate with the Investigation Division of the
Department of Public Safety regarding gathering intelligence on
and initiating investigations of cyber threats and incidents.
Sec. 12. 1. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall establish policies and procedures for:
(a) A state agency to notify the Office of any specific threat to
the security of an information system operated or maintained by
the state agency;
(b) Any other public or private entity to voluntarily notify the
Office of any specific threat to the security of an information
system;
(c) The Office to notify state agencies, appropriate law
enforcement and prosecuting authorities and any other
appropriate public or private entity of any specific threat to the
security of an information system of which the Office has been
notified; and
(d) The Deputy Director to convene a cybersecurity incident
response team appointed pursuant to subsection 2 upon
notification of the Office of a specific threat to the security of an
information system.
2. In consultation with appropriate state agencies, local
governments and agencies of the Federal Government, the Deputy
Director shall appoint a cybersecurity incident response team or
teams. Such a team may include, without limitation, an
investigator employed by the Investigation Division of the
Department of Public Safety.
3. A cybersecurity incident response team appointed pursuant
to subsection 2 shall convene at the call of the Deputy Director
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
and, subject to the direction of the Deputy Director, shall assist the
Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense and any
appropriate state agencies, local governments or agencies of the
Federal Government in responding to a threat to the security of an
information system.
4. A private entity may, in its discretion, use the services of a
cybersecurity incident response team appointed pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 13. 1. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall prepare and make publicly available a statewide
strategic plan that outlines policies, procedures, best practices and
recommendations for preparing for and mitigating risks to, and
otherwise protecting, the security of information systems in this
State and for recovering from and otherwise responding to threats
to or attacks on the security of information systems in this State.
The statewide strategic plan prepared and made available
pursuant to this subsection must not identify or include
information which allows for the identification of specific
vulnerabilities in the information systems in this State.
2. The statewide strategic plan must include, without
limitation, policies, procedures, best practices and
recommendations for:
(a) Identifying, preventing and responding to threats to and
attacks on the security of information systems in this State;
(b) Ensuring the safety of, and the continued delivery of
essential services to, the people of this State in the event of a threat
to or attack on the security of an information system in this State;
(c) Protecting the confidentiality of personal information that
is stored on, transmitted to, from or through or generated by an
information system in this State;
(d) Investing in technologies, infrastructure and personnel for
protecting the security of information systems; and
(e) Enhancing the voluntary sharing of information and any
other collaboration among state agencies, local governments,
agencies of the Federal Government and appropriate private
entities regarding protecting the security of information systems.
3. The statewide strategic plan prepared pursuant to this
section must be updated at least every 2 years.
4. A private entity may, in its discretion, make use of the
information set forth in the statewide strategic plan.
5. Each agency of the State Government that has adopted a
cybersecurity policy shall test the adherence of its employees to
that policy on a periodic basis. Such an agency shall submit the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
results of the testing to the Office of Information Security and
Cyber Defense annually for consideration in the update of the
statewide strategic plan.
Sec. 14. 1. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall quarterly prepare and submit to the Governor a
report assessing the preparedness of the State, as of the date of the
report, to counteract, prevent and respond to potential
cybersecurity threats. The report must be based on information
and documents readily available to the Office.
2. Not later than July 1 of each year, the Office of
Information Security and Cyber Defense shall prepare and submit
to the Governor and the Nevada Commission on Homeland
Security created by NRS 239C.120 a report that includes, without
limitation:
(a) A summary of the progress made by the Office during the
immediately preceding year in executing, administering and
enforcing the provisions of sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act
and performing such duties and exercising such powers as are
conferred upon it pursuant to sections 5 to 16, inclusive, of this act
and any other specific statute;
(b) A general description of any threat during the immediately
preceding year to the security of an information system that
prompted the Deputy Director to convene a cybersecurity incident
response team pursuant to section 12 of this act, and a summary
of the response to the threat;
(c) A summary of the goals and objectives of the Office for the
upcoming year;
(d) A summary of any issues presenting challenges to the
Office; and
(e) Any other information that the Deputy Director determines
is appropriate to include in the report.
Sec. 15. 1. Each political subdivision shall adopt and
maintain a cybersecurity incident response plan. Each new or
revised plan must be filed within 10 days after adoption or revision
with the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense.
2. The Chief shall, by regulation, prescribe the contents of a
cybersecurity incident response plan, which must include, without
limitation, a plan:
(a) To prepare for a cybersecurity threat;
(b) To detect and analyze a cybersecurity threat;
(c) To contain, eradicate and recover from a cybersecurity
incident; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(d) For postincident activity that includes a discussion
regarding information learned and any analytics associated with
the cybersecurity incident.
3. Each political subdivision shall review its cybersecurity
incident response plan at least once each year and, as soon as
practicable after the review is completed but not later than
December 31 of each year, file with the Office of Information
Security and Cyber Defense:
(a) Any revised cybersecurity incident response plan resulting
from the review; or
(b) A written certification that the most recent cybersecurity
incident response plan filed pursuant to subsection 1 is the current
cybersecurity incident response plan for the political subdivision.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, a
cybersecurity incident response plan filed pursuant to the
requirements of this section, including any revisions adopted
thereto, is confidential and must be securely maintained by the
Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense. An officer,
employee or other person to whom the plan is entrusted by the
Office shall not disclose the contents of such a plan except:
(a) Upon the lawful order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(b) As is reasonably necessary in the case of an act of
terrorism or related emergency; or
(c) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 239.0115.
5. As used in this section, “political subdivision” means a city
or county of this State.
Sec. 16. 1. Any record of a state agency, including, without
limitation, a record of the Office of Information Security and
Cyber Defense or local government or a record obtained from a
private entity which identifies the detection or investigation of or a
response to a suspected or confirmed threat to or attack on the
security of an information system is not a public record and may
be disclosed by the Deputy Director only to another state agency,
local government, a cybersecurity incident response team
convened pursuant to section 12 of this act and appropriate law
enforcement or prosecuting authorities and only for the purposes
of preparing for and mitigating risks to, and otherwise protecting,
the security of an information system or as part of a criminal
investigation.
2. The Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense
shall not require any private entity to provide any information or
data that, in the sole discretion of the private entity, would
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
compromise any information system operated or maintained by the
private entity if such information or data were made public.
Sec. 17. NRS 242.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.080 1. The Office of the Chief Information Officer is
hereby created within the Office of the Governor.
2. The Office consists of the Chief and:
(a) The Administration Unit. The Chief is the head of the
Administration Unit.
(b) The Client Services Unit.
(c) The Computing Services Unit.
(d) The Network Services Unit.
(e) The Office of Information Security [.] and Cyber Defense.
(f) Other units, groups, divisions or departments deemed
necessary by the Chief to the extent such functions are supported by
the appropriations allocated to the functions of the Office.
3. A Network Transport Services Group and a
Telecommunications Group are hereby created within the Network
Services Unit of the Office.
Sec. 18. NRS 242.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.101 1. The Chief Information Officer shall:
(a) Appoint a Deputy [Chief] Director of the Office of
Information Security and Cyber Defense who is in the [classified]
unclassified service of the State;
(b) Administer the provisions of this chapter and other
provisions of law relating to the duties of the Office of the Chief
Information Officer;
(c) Employ, within the limits of the approved budget of the
Office, such other staff as is necessary for the performance of the
duties of the Office; and
(d) Carry out other duties and exercise other powers specified by
law.
2. The Chief may form committees to establish standards and
determine criteria for evaluation of policies relating to informational
services.
Sec. 19. NRS 242.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.111 The Chief shall adopt regulations necessary for the
administration of this chapter, including:
1. The policy for the information systems of the Executive
Branch of Government, excluding the Nevada System of Higher
Education and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System, as
that policy relates, but is not limited, to such items as standards for
systems and programming and criteria for selection, location and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
use of information systems to meet the requirements of state
agencies and officers at the least cost to the State;
2. The procedures of the Office in providing information
services, which may include provision for the performance, by an
agency which uses the services or equipment of the Office, of
preliminary procedures, such as data recording and verification,
within the agency;
3. The effective administration of the Office, including,
without limitation, security to prevent unauthorized access to
information systems and plans for the recovery of systems and
applications after they have been disrupted;
4. The development of standards to ensure the security of the
information systems of the Executive Branch of Government; [and]
5. Specifications and standards for the employment of all
personnel of the Office [.] ; and
6. The policies and procedures necessary to coordinate the
cybersecurity activities of state agencies and local governments.
Sec. 20. NRS 242.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.181 1. Any state agency or elected state officer which
uses the equipment or services of the Office shall adhere to the
regulations, standards, practices, policies and conventions of the
Office.
2. Each state agency or elected state officer described in
subsection 1 shall report any suspected incident of:
(a) Unauthorized access to an information system or application
of an information system of the Office used by the state agency or
elected state officer; and
(b) Noncompliance with the regulations, standards, practices,
policies and conventions of the Office that is identified by the Office
as security-related,
 to the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense of the
Office within 24 hours after discovery of the suspected incident. If
the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense determines
that an incident of unauthorized access or noncompliance occurred,
it shall immediately report the incident to the Chief. The Chief shall
assist in the investigation and resolution of any such incident.
3. The Office shall provide services to each state agency and
elected state officer described in subsection 1 uniformly with respect
to degree of service, priority of service, availability of service and
cost of service.
Sec. 21. NRS 242.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.183 1. The [Chief] Deputy Director of the Office of
Information Security and Cyber Defense shall investigate and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
resolve any breach of an information system of a state agency or
elected officer that uses the equipment or services of the Office of
the Chief Information Officer or an application of such an
information system or unauthorized acquisition of computerized
data that materially compromises the security, confidentiality or
integrity of such an information system.
2. The Chief Information Officer or [Chief] Deputy Director of
the Office of Information Security [,] and Cyber Defense, at his or
her discretion, may inform members of the Technological Crime
Advisory Board created by NRS 205A.040, the Nevada
Commission on Homeland Security created by NRS 239C.120 and
the Information Technology Advisory Board created by NRS
242.122 of any breach of an information system of a state agency or
elected officer or application of such an information system or
unauthorized acquisition of computerized data or information that
materially compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of
such an information system.
Sec. 22. NRS 205.4765 is hereby amended to read as follows:
205.4765 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a
person who knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Modifies;
(b) Damages;
(c) Destroys;
(d) Discloses;
(e) Uses;
(f) Transfers;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Takes;
(i) Retains possession of;
(j) Copies;
(k) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed; or
(l) Enters,
 data, a program or any supporting documents which exist inside
or outside a computer, system or network is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Modifies;
(b) Destroys;
(c) Uses;
(d) Takes;
(e) Damages;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(f) Transfers;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Copies;
(i) Retains possession of; or
(j) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed,
 equipment or supplies that are used or intended to be used in a
computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Destroys;
(b) Damages;
(c) Takes;
(d) Alters;
(e) Transfers;
(f) Discloses;
(g) Conceals;
(h) Copies;
(i) Uses;
(j) Retains possession of; or
(k) Obtains or attempts to obtain access to, permits access to or
causes to be accessed,
 a computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization:
(a) Obtains and discloses;
(b) Publishes;
(c) Transfers; or
(d) Uses,
 a device used to access a computer, network or data is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, a person who
knowingly, willfully and without authorization introduces, causes to
be introduced or attempts to introduce a computer contaminant into
a computer, system or network is guilty of a misdemeanor.
6. If the violation of any provision of this section:
(a) Was committed to devise or execute a scheme to defraud or
illegally obtain property;
(b) Caused response costs, loss, injury or other damage in excess
of $500; or
(c) Caused an interruption or impairment of a public service,
including, without limitation, a governmental operation, a system of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
public communication or transportation or a supply of water, gas or
electricity,
 the person is guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished
as provided in NRS 193.130, and may be further punished by a fine
of not more than $100,000. In addition to any other penalty, the
court shall order the person to pay restitution.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to a person
performing any testing, including, without limitation, penetration
testing, of an information system of an agency that uses the
equipment or services of the Office of the Chief Information Officer
within the Office of the Governor that is authorized by the Chief of
that Office or the [head] Deputy Director of the Office of
Information Security and Cyber Defense of the Office of the Chief
Information Officer. As used in this subsection:
(a) “Information system” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 242.057.
(b) “Penetration testing” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 242.171.
Sec. 23. NRS 293.0635 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.0635 “Information system” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS [480.906.] 242.057.
Sec. 24. NRS 293.104 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.104 “Security of an information system” has the meaning
ascribed to it in [NRS 480.910.] section 8 of this act.
Sec. 25. NRS 293.870 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.870 1. Any records of the Secretary of State or a county
or city clerk that relate to the security of an information system used
for elections are confidential and are not public records pursuant to
chapter 239 of NRS. Such records include, without limitation:
(a) Risk assessments;
(b) Vulnerability assessments; and
(c) Any other information that identifies the preparation for or
prevention of a threat or attack on an information system used for
elections.
2. The Secretary of State or a county or city clerk shall not
disclose any records that are confidential pursuant to this section,
except that such records may be provided confidentially to:
(a) Any state agency or local government;
(b) A cybersecurity incident response team [appointed]
convened pursuant to [NRS 480.928;] section 12 of this act; or
(c) Appropriate law enforcement officers or prosecuting
attorneys,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
 but only for the purpose of preparing for and mitigating risks to
or otherwise protecting the security of elections or as part of a
criminal investigation.
Sec. 26. NRS 480.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.130 The Department consists of:
1. An Investigation Division;
2. A Nevada Highway Patrol Division;
3. A State Fire Marshal Division;
4. A Division of Parole and Probation;
5. A Capitol Police Division;
6. [A Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination;
7.] A Training Division; and
[8.] 7. A Records, Communications and Compliance Division.
Sec. 27. NRS 480.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.140 The primary functions and responsibilities of the
divisions of the Department are as follows:
1. The Investigation Division shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
453 of NRS relating to controlled substances and chapter 454 of
NRS relating to dangerous drugs;
(b) Investigate technological crime, as defined in NRS
205A.030, and enforce the provisions of the law of this State
relating to technological crime, as defined in NRS 205A.030;
(c) Provide investigative services to the divisions of the
Department as determined by the Director;
(d) Assist the Secretary of State in carrying out an investigation
pursuant to NRS 293.124;
(e) Upon request, assist:
(1) The Department of Taxation in carrying out a criminal
investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to
372A.380, inclusive, and chapter 678A of NRS;
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services in carrying out a
criminal investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to chapter 678C
of NRS; and
(3) The Cannabis Compliance Board in carrying out a
criminal investigation pursuant to title 56 of NRS; and
(f) Perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to this chapter and any other specific
statute.
2. The Nevada Highway Patrol Division shall, in conjunction
with the Department of Motor Vehicles, execute, administer and
enforce the provisions of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
and perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.360 and any other specific
statute.
3. The State Fire Marshal Division shall execute, administer
and enforce the provisions of chapter 477 of NRS and perform such
duties and exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it
pursuant to chapter 477 of NRS and any other specific statute.
4. The Division of Parole and Probation shall execute,
administer and enforce the provisions of chapters 176A and 213 of
NRS relating to parole and probation and perform such duties and
exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to those
chapters and any other specific statute.
5. The Capitol Police Division shall assist in the enforcement
of subsection 1 of NRS 331.140.
6. [The Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination shall:
(a) Serve as the strategic planning, facilitating and coordinating
office for cybersecurity policy and planning in this State; and
(b) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of NRS
480.900 to 480.950, inclusive, and perform such duties and exercise
such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.900
to 480.950, inclusive, and any other specific statute.
7.] The Training Division shall provide training to the
employees of the Department.
[8.] 7. The Records, Communications and Compliance
Division shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
179A of NRS and perform such duties and exercise such powers as
may be conferred upon it pursuant to chapter 179A of NRS and any
other specific statute;
(b) Provide dispatch services for the Department and other
agencies as determined by the Director;
(c) Maintain records of the Department as determined by the
Director; and
(d) Provide support services to the Director, the divisions of the
Department and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System as
may be imposed by the Director.
Sec. 28. NRS 603A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.210 1. A data collector that maintains records which
contain personal information of a resident of this State shall
implement and maintain reasonable security measures to protect
those records from unauthorized access, acquisition, destruction,
use, modification or disclosure.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
2. If a data collector is a governmental agency and maintains
records which contain personal information of a resident of this
State, the data collector shall, to the extent practicable, with respect
to the collection, dissemination and maintenance of those records,
comply with the current version of the CIS Controls as published by
the Center for Internet Security, Inc. or its successor organization, or
corresponding standards adopted by the National Institute of
Standards and Technology of the United States Department of
Commerce.
3. A contract for the disclosure of the personal information of a
resident of this State which is maintained by a data collector must
include a provision requiring the person to whom the information is
disclosed to implement and maintain reasonable security measures
to protect those records from unauthorized access, acquisition,
destruction, use, modification or disclosure.
4. If a state or federal law requires a data collector to provide
greater protection to records that contain personal information of a
resident of this State which are maintained by the data collector and
the data collector is in compliance with the provisions of that state
or federal law, the data collector shall be deemed to be in
compliance with the provisions of this section.
5. The Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense of
the Office of the Chief Information Officer within the Office of the
Governor shall create, maintain and make available to the public a
list of controls and standards with which the State is required to
comply pursuant to any federal law, regulation or framework that
also satisfy the controls and standards set forth in subsection 2.
Sec. 29. NRS 603A.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603A.215 1. If a data collector doing business in this State
accepts a payment card in connection with a sale of goods or
services, the data collector shall comply with the current version of
the Payment Card Industry (PCI) Data Security Standard, as adopted
by the PCI Security Standards Council or its successor organization,
with respect to those transactions, not later than the date for
compliance set forth in the Payment Card Industry (PCI) Data
Security Standard or by the PCI Security Standards Council or its
successor organization.
2. A data collector doing business in this State to whom
subsection 1 does not apply shall not:
(a) Transfer any personal information through an electronic,
nonvoice transmission other than a facsimile to a person outside of
the secure system of the data collector unless the data collector uses
encryption to ensure the security of electronic transmission; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
(b) Move any data storage device containing personal
information beyond the logical or physical controls of the data
collector, its data storage contractor or, if the data storage device is
used by or is a component of a multifunctional device, a person who
assumes the obligation of the data collector to protect personal
information, unless the data collector uses encryption to ensure the
security of the information.
3. A data collector shall not be liable for damages for a breach
of the security of the system data if:
(a) The data collector is in compliance with this section; and
(b) The breach is not caused by the gross negligence or
intentional misconduct of the data collector, its officers, employees
or agents.
4. The requirements of this section do not apply to:
(a) A telecommunication provider acting solely in the role of
conveying the communications of other persons, regardless of the
mode of conveyance used, including, without limitation:
(1) Optical, wire line and wireless facilities;
(2) Analog transmission; and
(3) Digital subscriber line transmission, voice over Internet
protocol and other digital transmission technology.
(b) Data transmission over a secure, private communication
channel for:
(1) Approval or processing of negotiable instruments,
electronic fund transfers or similar payment methods; or
(2) Issuance of reports regarding account closures due to
fraud, substantial overdrafts, abuse of automatic teller machines or
related information regarding a customer.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Data storage device” means any device that stores
information or data from any electronic or optical medium,
including, but not limited to, computers, cellular telephones,
magnetic tape, electronic computer drives and optical computer
drives, and the medium itself.
(b) “Encryption” means the protection of data in electronic or
optical form, in storage or in transit, using:
(1) An encryption technology that has been adopted by an
established standards setting body, including, but not limited to, the
Federal Information Processing Standards issued by the National
Institute of Standards and Technology, which renders such data
indecipherable in the absence of associated cryptographic keys
necessary to enable decryption of such data;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(2) Appropriate management and safeguards of
cryptographic keys to protect the integrity of the encryption using
guidelines promulgated by an established standards setting body,
including, but not limited to, the National Institute of Standards and
Technology; and
(3) Any other technology or method identified by the Office
of Information Security and Cyber Defense of the Office of the
Chief Information Officer within the Office of the Governor in
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 603A.217.
(c) “Facsimile” means an electronic transmission between two
dedicated fax machines using Group 3 or Group 4 digital formats
that conform to the International [Telecommunications]
Telecommunication Union T.4 or T.38 standards or computer
modems that conform to the International [Telecommunications]
Telecommunication Union T.31 or T.32 standards. The term does
not include onward transmission to a third device after protocol
conversion, including, but not limited to, any data storage device.
(d) “Multifunctional device” means a machine that incorporates
the functionality of devices, which may include, without limitation,
a printer, copier, scanner, facsimile machine or electronic mail
terminal, to provide for the centralized management, distribution or
production of documents.
(e) “Payment card” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.602.
(f) “Telecommunication provider” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 704.027.
Sec. 30. The Office of Information Security and Cyber
Defense shall prepare and make available to the public the statewide
strategic plan required by section 13 of this act not later than
January 1, 2026.
Sec. 31. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
a person who has been appointed to or is otherwise incumbent in the
position of Deputy Chief of the Office of Information Security as of
July 1, 2025, is in the classified service of the State and must remain
in the classified service of the State until he or she vacates the
position.
Sec. 32. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
Sec. 33. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 34. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 35. NRS 480.900, 480.902, 480.904, 480.906, 480.908,
480.910, 480.912, 480.920, 480.924, 480.926, 480.928, 480.930,
480.932, 480.935, 480.940 and 480.950 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 36. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)